Utah statutes.
35A-8-727.   New housing grants -- Reimbursement from Housing Relief Restricted Special Revenue Fund.

(1)  Subject to the availability of funds in the Housing Relief Restricted Special Revenue Fund created in Section 67-4-18, the corporation shall approve on behalf of the state a grant of $6,000 to a person who:

(a)  purchases a newly constructed, never-occupied residence in Utah using a 30-year fixed interest rate note and mortgage; and

(b)  meets the requirements established in Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  A person may not receive a grant under this section if the person's income, as determined by the corporation, exceeds:

(a)  $75,000 for a single person; or

(b)  $150,000 for a married couple.

(3)  The corporation shall establish procedures for determining a person's eligibility for a grant under this section, including establishing a limit on the time that money for a grant may remain in escrow, which may not exceed 90 days.

